Utah statutes.
72-4-116.   State highways -- SR-101 to SR-110.
State highways include:
(1)  SR-101.  From Wellsville on Route 23 easterly through Hyrum to the
Hardware Ranch with a stub connection to the visitors' center and parking
area.
(2)  SR-102.  From Route 83 east of Lampo Junction northeasterly through
Penrose to Thatcher; then easterly through Tremonton and Deweyville to Route
38.
(3)  SR-103.  From Route 126 in Clearfield easterly on 650 North Street in
Clearfield to Hill Air Force Base main gate.
(4)  SR-104.  From Route 126 easterly on Wilson Lane, Twentieth Street, and
Twenty-first Street in Ogden to Route 204.
(5)  SR-105.  From Route 67 east on Parrish Lane in Centerville to Route 106.
(6)  SR-106.  From .21 miles west of Route 15 east on 400 North Street in
Bountiful; then northerly to Sheppard Lane in Farmington; then west on
Sheppard Lane to Route 89.
(7)  SR-107.  From Route 110 west of West Point easterly through West Point to
Route 126 in Clearfield.
(8)  SR-108.  From the I-15 north bound on- and off-ramps at the Hill Field
South Gate Interchange in Layton west to Syracuse; then north into Weber
County; then northeasterly to Route 126.
(9)  SR-109.  From Route 126 easterly through Layton to Route 89.
(10)  SR-110.  From Route 127 west of Syracuse north to Route 37 west of
Clinton.
